Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 59.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-219.02
Application for license to establish a barber shop; form; contents; transfer; fees; inspection.

Application for a license to establish a barber shop shall be made on a form furnished by the board. It shall contain such information relative to ownership, management, sanitation, and other data concerning such business as may be required by the board. The board shall collect with such application, in addition to the license fee, a fee to be set by the board. A fee shall be collected for the transfer of license or change of ownership of a barber shop, but no fee shall be collected if the ownership results merely from a present license holder incorporating his or her business. Every barber shop shall be called upon by the state barber inspector at least once each licensing period for the purpose of inspection in order to be eligible for a permit to conduct a barber shop, and no license shall be issued unless all deficiencies found by inspection of such shop have been corrected.

Laws 1975, LB 66, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 15;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 92;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 59.
August 30, 2009